Hawaii statutes.
[§457-1.5] Practice of nursing.
(a) Nursing is a scientific process founded on a body of professional
knowledge. It is a learned profession based on an understanding of the human
condition across the lifespan of a client and the relationship of a client with
others and within the environment. It is also an art dedicated to caring for
others. The practice of nursing means assisting clients in attaining or
maintaining optimal health, implementing a strategy of care to accomplish
defined goals within the context of a client-centered health care plan, and
evaluating responses to nursing care and treatment. Nursing is a dynamic
discipline that is continually evolving to include more sophisticated
knowledge, technologies, and client care activities. Nursing applies
evidence-based practice to promote optimal client outcomes.

(b) The scope of nursing practices established
in this chapter and by the rules of the board shall serve as general guidelines
and are not intended to address the appropriateness of the use of specific
procedures in any particular work setting or to grant permission to implement
specific procedures in any particular work setting. [L 2010, c 57, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next